Florida, session 2026, HB4001.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. (1) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, this act and all rules adopted pursuant to this act
apply to the area located within Jefferson County.
(2) As used in this act, the term:
(a) "Emergency medical transportation services" includes,
but is not limited to, services rendered by means of air
ambulance or an emergency medical services vehicle. As used in
this paragraph, the term:
1. "Air ambulance" means a fixed-wing or rotary-wing
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4001 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4001 2026 Legislature
aircraft used for, or intended to be used for, air
transportation of sick or injured persons requiring or likely to
require medical attention during transport.
2. "Emergency medical services vehicle" means a privately
or publicly owned vehicle or vessel that is designed,
constructed, reconstructed, maintained, equipped, or operated
for, and is used or intended to be used for, land or water
transportation of sick or injured persons requiring or likely to
require medical attention during transport.
(b) "Health care provider" means:
1. A hospital licensed under chapter 395, Florida
Statutes.
2. A physician or physician assistant licensed under
chapter 458, Florida Statutes.
3. An osteopathic physician or physician assistant
licensed under chapter 459, Florida Statutes.
4. A podiatric physician licensed under chapter 461,
Florida Statutes.
5. A health maintenance organization certificated under
part I of chapter 641, Florida Statutes.
6. An ambulatory surgical center licensed under chapter
395, Florida Statutes.
7. An other medical facility. As used in this
subparagraph, the term "other medical facility" means a facility
the primary purpose of which is to provide human medical
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4001 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4001 2026 Legislature
diagnostic services or a facility providing nonsurgical human
medical treatment, to which facility the patient is admitted and
from which facility the patient is discharged within the same
working day, and which facility is not part of a hospital.
However, the term does not include a facility existing for the
primary purpose of performing terminations of pregnancy or an
office maintained by a physician or dentist for the practice of
medicine.
8. A professional association, partnership, corporation,
joint venture, or other association composed of the persons
described in subparagraphs 2., 3., and 4. for professional
activity.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), compensation
to a health care provider to provide medical services for an
inmate housed in a Jefferson County detention center may not
exceed 110 percent of the Medicare allowable rate if the health
care provider does not have a contract with Jefferson County to
provide inmate medical services.
(b) Compensation to a health care provider to provide
medical services for an inmate housed in a Jefferson County
detention center may not exceed 125 percent of the Medicare
allowable rate if the health care provider:
1. Does not have a contract with Jefferson County to
provide inmate medical services; and
2. Reported a negative operating margin for the previous
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4001 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4001 2026 Legislature
year to the Agency for Health Care Administration through
hospital-audited financial data.
(4) Compensation to an entity to provide emergency medical
transportation services for an inmate housed in a Jefferson
County detention center may not exceed 110 percent of the
Medicare allowable rate if the entity does not have a contract
with Jefferson County to provide inmate emergency medical
transportation services.
(5) This act does not apply to charges for medical
services provided at a hospital operated by Jefferson County.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4001 -00-er